dictsource/mt_rules
// Maltese translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded


.group a
          a          a
          aa         a:
          au         au
		  ax		 aS
      


.group b
          b          b
          bb         b:
		  be		 b'@
		  br		 br'@
		  bi		 bi:
		  bie		 bi'@
		  
.group c
		  
		  c			 c
		  
		  
.group ċ
          ċ         tS@
          ċa       	tS@a
          ċe      	tS@e         
          ċi		tS@i              
		  ċw		tS@u'@

.group d
          d          de
          dd         d:
		  


.group e
          e          e
          eu         eu:
		  ew		 eu
          

.group f
          f          f	
		  ff		 f:
		  fo		 fo

.group g
          g          g
          gg         g:
		  ge		 gie
		  gi		 gi:
		  għ		 :	
		  
.group ġ
		  ġ			dZ
		  ġo		dZo
		  
.group h	  
		  
		  h			:
		 
		 
.group ħ

		  ħ			h
		  ħu		h:u:
		  ħt		ht
.group i
          i          I
          iu         Iu
          ie         i:
         


.group j
          j          iu
		  jj		 i:
		  jo		 io
		  je		 ie
		  ja		 ia
		  

.group k
          k          ke
          ka         ka
		  ke		 ke
		  ki		 ki:
		  kie		 ki:e
		  ku		 ku:
		  ko		 co

.group l
          l          l

       
.group m
          m   		m
		  m (n		im
		  m (p		im
		  m (r		im
		  
.group n
          n          n
         nu			 nu:



.group o
          o          o
          

.group p
          p          p
          pp         p:

    _ole) p (a       p:      
    _ota) p (a       p:      

     kam) p (anj     p:      

     sam) p (oo      p:      
    sham) p (o       p:      


.group q
          q          '@
		  qa		  a
		  qe		  e
		  qo		  o
		  qu		  


.group r
          r          r
		  rie		 ri:e
		  ro		 ro:
		  ra		 ra:
		  

.group s
          s          s
          sie		 si:e
		  saqq		 sa
		  saq		 sa


.group t
          t          t
          tt         t:

       


.group u
          u			u
		  ux		uS


.group v
          v          v


.group w
          w          u


.group x
          x          Se
		  xie		 Sei:	
          


.group y
          y          y
          yy         y:
          yi         yi
          yö         yY


.group z
          z          tse
       K) zh         Z

    


.group ż
          ż				z'@
		  ża			za
		  że			ze
		  żie			zi:e
		  żgħ			za

// default group for "non of the above"

.group
          ż				z'@
		  ċ             tS@
// non-ascii characters with specified pronunciations
